Idaho, session 2025, H0011.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 90, Title 18, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 90
ILLEGAL ENTRY INTO THIS STATE
18-9001. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Alien" has the meaning assigned by 8 U.S.C. 1101, as that provision
existed on January 1, 2023.
(2) "Port of entry" means a port of entry in the United States pursuant
to 19 CFR 101.
18-9002. ILLEGAL ENTRY FROM FOREIGN NATION. (1) A person who is an
alien commits an offense if the person enters or attempts to enter this state
directly from a foreign nation at any location other than a lawful port of
entry.
(2) A violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor upon a first con-
viction. A second or subsequent conviction shall be a felony.
(3) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution under this sec-
tion that:
(a) The federal government has granted the defendant:
(i) Lawful presence in the United States; or
(ii) Asylum under 8 U.S.C. 1158;
(b) The defendant's conduct does not constitute a violation of 8 U.S.C.
1325(a); or


(c) The defendant was approved for benefits under the federal deferred
action for childhood arrivals program between June 15, 2012, and July
16, 2021.
(4) The following federal programs do not provide an affirmative de-
fense for purposes of subsection (3)(a) of this section:
(a) The deferred action for parents of Americans and lawful permanent
residents program; and
(b) Any program not enacted by the United States congress that is a suc-
cessor to or materially similar to the program described by subsection
(3)(c) or paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a de-
fendant shall not be eligible for deferred adjudication or a withheld judg-
ment if the defendant is charged with or convicted of an offense pursuant to
this section.
18-9003. ILLEGAL REENTRY BY CERTAIN ALIENS. (1) A person who is an
alien commits an offense if the person enters, attempts to enter, or is at any
time found in this state after the person:
(a) Has been denied admission to or excluded, deported, or removed from
the United States; or
(b) Has departed from the United States while an order of exclusion, de-
portation, or removal is outstanding.
(2) A violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor, except that the
violation shall be a felony if:
(a) The defendant's removal was subsequent to a conviction for commis-
sion of two (2) or more misdemeanors involving drugs, crimes against a
person, or both;
(b) The defendant was excluded pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1225(c) because the
defendant was excludable under 8 U.S.C. 1182(a)(3)(B);
(c) The defendant was removed pursuant to the provisions of 8 U.S.C.
chapter 12, subchapter V; or
(d) The defendant was removed pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1231(a)(4)(B).
(3) For purposes of this section, "removal" includes an order issued
pursuant to section 19-6301, Idaho Code, or any other agreement in which an
alien stipulates to removal pursuant to a criminal proceeding pursuant to
either federal or state law.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a de-
fendant shall not be eligible for deferred adjudication or withheld judgment
if the defendant is charged with or convicted of an offense pursuant to this
section.
18-9004. REFUSAL TO COMPLY WITH AN ORDER TO RETURN TO FOREIGN NA-
TION. (1) A person who is an alien commits an offense if:
(a) The person has been charged with or convicted of an offense pursuant
to this chapter;
(b) A magistrate or judge, as applicable, has issued an order pursuant
to section 19-6301, Idaho Code, for the person to return to the foreign
nation from which the person entered or attempted to enter; and
(c) The person refuses to comply with the order.
(2) A violation of this section shall be a felony.


18-9005. ABATEMENT OF PROSECUTION ON BASIS OF IMMIGRATION STATUS DE-
TERMINATION PROHIBITED. A court may not abate the prosecution of an offense
pursuant to this chapter on the basis that a federal determination regarding
the immigration status of the defendant is pending or will be initiated.
SECTION 2. That Title 19, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 63, Title 19, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 63
ORDER TO RETURN TO FOREIGN NATION
19-6301. ORDER TO RETURN TO FOREIGN NATION. (1) A magistrate during a
person's appearance pursuant to section 19-514 or 19-615, Idaho Code, may,
after making a determination that probable cause exists for arrest for an of-
fense pursuant to section 18-9002 or 18-9003, Idaho Code, order the person
released from custody and issue a written order in accordance with subsec-
tion (3) of this section.
(2) The judge in a person's case at any time after the person's appear-
ance before a magistrate pursuant to section 19-514 or 19-615, Idaho Code,
may, in lieu of continuing the prosecution of or entering an adjudication re-
garding an offense pursuant to section 18-9002 or 18-9003, Idaho Code, dis-
miss the charge pending against the person and issue a written order in ac-
cordance with subsection (3) of this section.
(3) A written order authorized by subsection (1) or (2) of this section
must discharge the person and require the person to return to the foreign na-
tion from which the person entered or attempted to enter and may be issued
only if:
(a) The person agrees to the order;
(b) The person has not previously been convicted of an offense under
chapter 90, title 18, Idaho Code, or previously obtained a discharge un-
der an order described by subsection (1) or (2) of this section;
(c) The person is not charged with another offense that is punishable as
a felony; and
(d) Before the issuance of the order, the arresting law enforcement
agency:
(i) Collects all available identifying information of the per-
son, which must include taking fingerprints from the person and
using other applicable photographic and biometric measures to
identify the person; and
(ii) Cross-references the collected information with:
1. All relevant local, state, and federal criminal
databases; and
2. Federal lists or classifications used to identify a per-
son as a threat or potential threat to national security.
(4) Upon a person's conviction of an offense under chapter 90, title 18,
Idaho Code, the judge shall enter in the judgment in the case an order requir-
ing the person to return to the foreign nation from which the person entered
or attempted to enter. An order issued pursuant to this subsection takes ef-
fect upon completion of the term of confinement or imprisonment imposed by
the judgment.


(5) An order issued pursuant to this section shall include:
(a) The manner of transportation of the person to a port of entry, as
defined in section 18-9001, Idaho Code; and
(b) The law enforcement officer or state agency responsible for moni-
toring compliance with the order.
(6) An order issued pursuant to this section shall be filed:
(a) With the county clerk of the county in which the person was ar-
rested, for an order described in subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) With the clerk of the court exercising jurisdiction in the case, for
an order described in subsection (2) or (4) of this section.
(7) Not later than the seventh day after the date an order is issued pur-
suant to this section, the law enforcement officer or state agency required
to monitor compliance with the order shall report the issuance of the order
to the Idaho state police for inclusion in the Idaho criminal history data-
base.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 3, Title 5, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 5-349, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
5-349. CIVIL IMMUNITY FOR AND INDEMNIFICATION OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT
OFFICIALS, EMPLOYEES, AND CONTRACTORS. (1) Except as provided by subsection
(4) of this section, a local government official, employee, or contractor
shall be immune from liability for damages arising from a cause of action
under state law resulting from an action taken by the official, employee,
or contractor to enforce the provisions of chapter 90, title 18, Idaho
Code, or an order issued pursuant to section 19-6301, Idaho Code, during
the course and scope of the official's, employee's, or contractor's office,
employment, or contractual performance for or service on behalf of the local
government.
(2) Subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section and ex-
cept as provided by subsection (4) of this section, a local government shall
indemnify an official, employee, or contractor of the local government for
damages arising from a cause of action under federal law resulting from an
action taken by the official, employee, or contractor to enforce the pro-
visions of chapter 90, title 18, Idaho Code, or an order issued pursuant to
section 19-6301, Idaho Code, during the course and scope of the official's,
employee's, or contractor's office, employment, or contractual performance
for or service on behalf of the local government.
(3) Indemnification payments made pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section by a local government shall not exceed:
(a) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to any one (1) person or
three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for any single occurrence in
the case of personal injury or death; or
(b) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a single occurrence of property
damage.
(4) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not apply if the court
or jury determines that the local government official, employee, or contrac-
tor acted in bad faith, with conscious indifference, or with recklessness.
(5) A local government shall indemnify an official, employee, or con-
tractor of the local government for reasonable attorney's fees incurred in


defense of a criminal prosecution against the official, employee, or con-
tractor for an action taken by the official, employee, or contractor to en-
force the provisions of chapter 90, title 18, Idaho Code, or an order issued
pursuant to section 19-6301, Idaho Code, during the course and scope of the
official's, employee's, or contractor's office, employment, or contractual
performance for or service on behalf of the local government.
(6) The provisions of this section may not be construed to waive any
statutory limits on damages under state law.
(7) For a civil action brought against a person who may be entitled
to immunity or indemnification pursuant to this section, an appeal must be
taken directly to the Idaho supreme court.
(8) The provisions of this section shall not affect a defense, immu-
nity, or jurisdictional bar available to a local government or an official,
employee, or contractor of a local government.
(9) As used in this section:
(a) "Damages" includes any and all damages, fines, fees, penalties,
court costs, attorney's fees, or other assessments.
(b) "Local government" means any municipality, county, school dis-
trict, or any other regional or local district or unit of government.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 3, Title 5, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 5-349A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
5-349A. CIVIL IMMUNITY FOR AND INDEMNIFICATION OF STATE OFFICIALS,
EMPLOYEES, AND CONTRACTORS. (1) Except as provided by subsection (4) of this
section, an elected or appointed state official or a state employee or con-
tractor is immune from liability for damages arising from a cause of action
under state law resulting from an action taken by the official, employee, or
contractor to enforce the provisions of chapter 90, title 18, Idaho Code, or
an order issued pursuant to section 19-6301, Idaho Code, during the course
and scope of the official's, employee's, or contractor's office, employ-
ment, or contractual performance for or service on behalf of the state.
(2) Except as provided by subsection (4) of this section, the state
shall indemnify an elected or appointed state official or a state employee
or contractor for damages arising from a cause of action under federal law
resulting from an action taken by the official, employee, or contractor to
enforce the provisions of chapter 90, title 18, Idaho Code, or an order is-
sued pursuant to section 19-6301, Idaho Code, during the course and scope of
the official's, employee's, or contractor's office, employment, or contrac-
tual performance for or service on behalf of the state.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary,
an indemnification payment made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
shall not be subject to an indemnification limit under the laws of this
state.
(4) The provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not
apply if the court or jury determines that the state official, employee, or
contractor acted in bad faith, with conscious indifference, or with reck-
lessness.
(5) The state shall indemnify a state official, employee, or contractor
for reasonable attorney's fees incurred in defense of a criminal prosecu-


tion against the official, employee, or contractor for an action taken by the
official, employee, or contractor to enforce the provisions of chapter 90,
title 18, Idaho Code, or an order issued pursuant to section 19-6301, Idaho
Code, during the course and scope of the official's, employee's, or contrac-
tor's office, employment, or contractual performance for or service on be-
half of the state.
(6) A state official, employee, or contractor who may be entitled to in-
demnification pursuant to subsection (2) of this section is entitled to rep-
resentation by the attorney general in an action in connection with which the
official, employee, or contractor may be entitled to that indemnification.
(7) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to waive any
statutory limits on damages under state law.
(8) For a civil action brought against a person who may be entitled
to immunity or indemnification pursuant to this section, an appeal must be
taken directly to the Idaho supreme court.
(9) The provisions of this section shall not affect a defense, immu-
nity, or jurisdictional bar available to the state or an official, employee,
or contractor of the state.
(10) As used in this section, "damages" includes any and all damages,
fines, fees, penalties, court costs, attorney's fees, or other assessments.
SECTION 5. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.